West Virginia, session 2026, HB4645.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 6O. Day Care Facility Property Tax. §11-6O-1. Day care facility tax reduction. All property, real and personal, owned and used by a day care facility, shall be assessed at full value, and the tax imposed on the property shall be reduced by 50 percent.